New York, session 2025-2026, S9526.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 408-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 408-c. Construction of school buildings and facilities; construction 4 contractor credentials. Any construction contractor hired to erect, 5 repair, enlarge or remodel any public or private school or educational 6 facility shall employ individuals who have acquired a transportation 7 worker identification credential card issued by the Transportation Secu- 8 rity Administration to work on such construction. For the purposes of 9 this section "construction contractor" shall mean any individual or 10 entity seeking permission either through a bid or otherwise to perform 11 construction and/or maintenance work on buildings and facilities occu- 12 pied at any point by students of a school district, charter school, 13 board of cooperative educational services, or nonpublic school. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06852-01-5